Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,100
Court-ordered indemnification.

Unless limited by a corporation's articles of incorporation, a director of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the district court, after giving any notice it considers necessary, may order indemnification in the amount it considers proper if it determines:

(1) The director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 21-1998, in which case the district court shall also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification; or

(2) The director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director met the standard of conduct set forth in subsection (a) of section 21-1997 or was adjudged liable as described in subsection (d) of section 21-1997, but if the director was adjudged so liable indemnification is limited to reasonable expenses incurred.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 100.